South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4744.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 27, Title 41 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 41-27-660. Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the Department of Employment and Workforce is authorized to send by electronic means any report, notice, demand, bill, or other communication or item that is statutorily required in Chapters 27 through 41 to be mailed. Any reference to a requirement that something be mailed must be construed to mean it may be sent physically by the United States Postal Service or a commercial or courier or electronically or digitally by electronic transmission, including email or other digital messaging systems. SECTION 2.  Article 1, Chapter 27, Title 41 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 41-27-315. "Mailed" means sent to a recipient: (1) physically by the United States Postal Service or a private or commercial courier; or (2) electronically or digitally by electronic transmission, including email or other digital messaging systems. Any reference to a requirement in this chapter that a report, notice, demand, bill, or other item be mailed must be construed to mean it may be transmitted physically as provided in item (1) or electronically as provided in this item. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----